Hawaii statutes.
§271G-7 General duties and powers of
the commission. The general duties and powers of the public utilities
commission shall be:

(1) To regulate water carriers, and to that end the
commission shall have and utilize the investigative powers set forth in section
269-7 as well as all of the duties and powers specifically enumerated in this
chapter, and water carriers shall be subject to the duties set forth in
sections 269-8 and 269-9 as well as all of the duties specifically enumerated
herein.

(2) To establish such just and reasonable
classifications of water carriers as the special nature of the services
performed by the carriers shall require, and such just and reasonable rules,
regulations, and requirements, consistent with this chapter, to be observed by
the carriers so classified or grouped, as the commission deems necessary or
desirable in the public interest. Such classifications, rules, regulations,
and requirements shall be adopted and promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 91 and shall have the force and effect of law.

(3) Upon complaint in writing to the commission by
any person or body politic, or upon its own initiative without complaint, the
commission may investigate whether any water carrier has failed to comply with
any provision of this chapter, or with any rule or order adopted or issued
hereunder.

(4) The commission may investigate any person acting
in the capacity of or engaging in the business of a water carrier within the
State, without having a certificate of public convenience and necessity or
other authority previously obtained under and in compliance with this chapter
or the rules promulgated under this chapter. [L 1974, c 94, pt of §1; am L
1991, c 57, §15]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next